Wisconsin, session 2025, SB428.
do enact as follows:SB428,11Section 1. 59.52 (29) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 59.52 (29) (a) 1. and 2amended to read:SB428,2,7359.52 (29) (a) 1. All public work, including any contract for the construction, 4repair, remodeling, or improvement of any public work, building, or furnishing of 5supplies or material of any kind where the estimated cost of such work will exceed 6$25,000 the bidding threshold under par. (e) 1. a. shall be let by contract to the 7lowest responsible bidder.SB428,2,983. Any public work, the estimated cost of which does not exceed $25,000 the 9bidding threshold under par. (e) 1. a., shall be let as the board may direct.SB428,2,13104. If the estimated cost of any public work is between $5,000 the notice 11threshold under par. (e) 1. b. and $25,000 the bidding threshold under par. (e) 1. a., 12the board shall give a class 1 notice under ch. 985 before it contracts for the work or 13shall contract with a person qualified as a bidder under s. 66.0901 (2).SB428,2,18142. A contract, the estimated cost of which exceeds $25,000 the bidding 15threshold under par. (e) 1. a., shall be let and entered into under s. 66.0901, except 16that the board may by a three-fourths vote of all the members entitled to a seat 17provide that any class of public work or any part thereof may be done directly by the 18county without submitting the same for bids.SB428,2,2119(c) 1. This subsection does not apply to public construction if the materials for 20such a the project are donated or if the labor for such a the project is provided by 21volunteers.SB428,3,222(d) This subsection does not apply to highway contracts which the county 1highway committee or the county highway commissioner is authorized by law to let 2or make, which shall be let or made under s. 83.04.SB428,23Section 2. 59.52 (29) (c) 2. of the statutes is created to read:SB428,3,6459.52 (29) (c) 2. This subsection does not apply to the construction by a private 5person of an improvement that is donated to the county after the completion of 6construction.SB428,37Section 3. 59.52 (29) (c) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB428,3,9859.52 (29) (c) 3. This subsection does not apply to public work for the purpose 9of providing housing for persons placed on supervised release under s. 980.08.SB428,410Section 4. 59.52 (29) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB428,3,121159.52 (29) (e) 1. Beginning on the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB 12inserts date}, the thresholds under par. (a) are the following:SB428,3,1313a. For general public works contract bidding, $50,000.SB428,3,1414b. For general public works contract notice, $10,000.SB428,3,19152. On the 5th year commencing after the effective date of this subdivision .... 16[LRB inserts date], and each subsequent 5th year, the thresholds under subd. 1. 17shall be increased by a percentage equal to the percentage change in the U.S. 18consumer price index for the previous 5 years, as determined by the federal 19department of labor, rounded to the nearest multiple of $1,000.SB428,520Section 5. Initial applicability.SB428,3,2221(1) This act first applies to bids solicited on the effective date of this 22subsection.SB428,3,2323